Utah statutes.
41-6a-1306.   School buses removed from service -- Removal of markings --
Repainting -- School district not to bear expense -- Infraction.
(1) (a)  As used in this section, "old school bus" means a school bus that has
been removed from service and is operated on the highways, streets, or roads
of this state for a nonschool permanent commercial use.
(b) A person who acquires an old school bus shall cause:
(i)  identifying markings be removed; and
(ii)  the bus be painted a color other than school-bus yellow.
(c)  The school districts may not be charged any expense related to removing
markings from the school bus removed from service.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction.
